Texas, session 892, HB274.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Subchapter C, Chapter 418, Government Code, is amended by adding Section 418.060 to read as follows: Sec. 418.060.  REQUIRED FLOOD DISASTER PLAN FOR CONGREGATE LIVING FACILITIES; ANNUAL DRILLS. (a)  In this section, "congregate living facility" means a facility in which individuals who are not related reside in close proximity and share at least one common room. (b)  Each congregate living facility shall: (1)  develop and implement a flood disaster plan, if the facility does not already have an existing flood disaster plan; (2)  annually conduct a drill of the facility's flood disaster plan; and (3)  submit to the division an attestation in a form and manner prescribed by the division that the facility conducted the drill. (c)  The annual drill described by Subsection (b)(2) is required to include each relevant member of the congregate living facility's staff on duty at the time of the drill and may exclude residents of the facility. (d)  The attorney general may bring an action to impose a civil penalty against a congregate living facility that fails to conduct an annual flood disaster plan drill in violation of this section in an amount not to exceed $5,000 for each violation. (e)  Each day a violation continues is a separate violation for purposes of imposing a civil penalty under this section. (f)  The attorney general may recover reasonable expenses incurred in bringing an action under this section, including court costs, reasonable attorney's fees, investigative costs, witness fees, and deposition costs. SECTION 2.  As soon as practicable after the effective date of this Act: (1)  each congregate living facility to which Section 418.060, Government Code, as added by this Act, applies that does not have a flood disaster plan shall develop and implement such a plan; and (2)  the Texas Division of Emergency Management shall adopt the attestation form required by Section 418.060, Government Code, as added by this Act. SECTION 3.  A congregate living facility to which Section 418.060, Government Code, as added by this Act, applies is not required to conduct the initial flood disaster plan drill required by that section before January 1, 2027. SECTION 4.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.